Massachusetts, session 194th, S1606.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Any group organized under Chapter 180 of the General Laws shall
provide and maintain at least 1 fully functional automated external defibrillator, also known as
AED, for emergency use.
(b) Any group or organization that is required to provide and maintain an AED pursuant
to subsection (a) shall provide mandatory training in accordance with the standards established
by the American Heart Association or the American National Red Cross on cardiopulmonary
resuscitation and the use of AEDs to: all organizational staff; all members of the organization;
any other individuals as determined by the leadership of the organization.
SECTION 2. There shall be a fund, subject to appropriation, established to assist any
group required by subsection (a) to provide an AED with procurement, maintenance, and
training necessary under Section 1.
of 1